Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 9. Expedited Sale of Residential Property

38-38-901.
to 38-38-907. (Repealed)

Editor’s note:

(1) This part 9 was added in 2010 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2014. For the text of this part 9 prior to 2014, consult the 2013 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

(2) Section 38-38-907 provided for the repeal of this part 9, effective July 1, 2014. (See

L

. 2010, p. 653.)